Hawaii statutes.
§431L-2.5 Insurer requirements.
Any health insurer as identified in section 431L-1 shall:

(1) Provide upon the
request of the State, information for all of its members to determine during
what period the individual or the individual's spouse or dependents may be or
may have been covered by a health insurer and the nature of the coverage that
is or was provided by the health insurer, including the name, address, and
identifying number of the plan in a manner prescribed by the State;

(2) Beginning in 2014, provide to an independent,
third party entity, no more than quarterly, a report listing its members. The
third party entity shall match this report with one provided by the department
of human services and provide the department of human services with third party
liability information for medical assistance recipients. The department of
human services shall determine the minimum data required to ensure the validity
of matches, which may include name, date of birth, and social security number,
as available. The information provided by the health insurers to the third
party entity shall not be used for any purpose other than that specified in
this chapter. The department of human services shall provide for
representation by private health insurers in evaluating the qualifications of
potential third party entities and determining the minimum data fields for
matching;

(3) Accept the State's right of recovery and the
assignment to the State of any right of an individual or other entity to
payment from the party for a health care item or service for which payment has
been made for medical assistance under title 42 United States Code section
1396a (section 1902 of the Social Security Act);

(4) Respond to any inquiry by the State regarding a
claim for payment for any health care item or service that is submitted not
later than three years after the date of the provision of the health care item
or service; and

(5) Agree not to deny a claim submitted by the State
solely on the basis of the date of submission of the claim, the type or format
of the claim form, or a failure to present proper documentation at the
point-of-sale that is the basis of the claim, if:

(A) The claim is submitted by the State within
the three-year period beginning on the date on which the health care item or
service was furnished; and

(B) Any action by the State to enforce its
rights with respect to the claim is commenced within six years of the State's
submission of the claim. [L 2009, c 103, §2; am L 2012, c 95, §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next